Hawaii statutes.
§386-90 Conforming prior decisions on
appeal. Upon the filing of a certified copy of a decision of the director
rendered pursuant to section 386-89 with the appellate board, the board shall
revoke or modify its prior decision so that it will conform to the decision of
the director. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-99; HRS §386-90; am L 1969, c
244, §2f]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next